Utah statutes.
59-1-705.   Payment and collection of penalties, interest, and other liabilities.

The penalties, interest, and other liabilities imposed by the provisions of Title 59 shall be paid by the taxpayer upon notice and demand by the commission, and shall be assessed and collected in the same manner as taxes.  Except as otherwise provided, any reference in Title 59 to "tax" includes penalties, interest, and other liabilities.

